Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that inclusion of tribal members on the board of natural resources will provide crucial perspective and expertise that will be invaluable as it makes decisions that serve the public.Sec. 2. RCW 43.30.205 and 2025 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board shall consist of ((six))eight members:(a) The governor or the governor's designee;(b) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee from the office of the superintendent of public instruction;(c) The commissioner;(d) The director of the University of Washington school of forest resources;(e) The dean of the Washington State University college of agricultural, human, and natural resource sciences; ((and))(f) A representative of those counties that contain state forestlands acquired or transferred under RCW 79.22.010, 79.22.040, and 79.22.020; and(g) Tribal representation.(2)(a) The county representative on the board shall be selected by the legislative authorities of those counties that contain state forestlands acquired or transferred under RCW 79.22.010, 79.22.040, and 79.22.020. In the selection of the county representative, each participating county shall have one vote. The Washington state association of counties shall convene a meeting for the purpose of making the selection and shall notify the board of the selection.(b) The county representative must be a duly elected member of a county legislative authority who shall serve a term of four years unless the representative should leave office for any reason. The initial term shall begin on July 1, 1986.(3)(a) Two tribal representatives shall be appointed by the governor and the representatives must be members of a federally recognized Indian tribe. One tribal representative shall represent the portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade mountains, and one tribal representative shall represent the portion of the state lying west of the summit of the Cascade mountains. Each tribal representative shall serve a term of four years unless the representative should leave office for any reason. The initial terms shall begin on July 1, 2026.(b) When appointing tribal representatives, the governor shall solicit and consider nominees from each of the federally recognized Indian tribes in Washington and from each of the federally recognized Indian tribes with treaty ceded lands in Washington. The governor shall collaborate with federally recognized Indian tribes on the selection of the tribal representatives.--- END ---